Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-280
Adjudication; effect; use of in-court statements.

No adjudication by the juvenile court upon the status of a juvenile shall be deemed a conviction nor shall the adjudication operate to impose any of the civil disabilities ordinarily resulting from conviction. The adjudication and the evidence given in the court shall not operate to disqualify such juvenile in any future civil or military service application or appointment. Any admission, answer of no contest, confession, or statement made by the juvenile in court and admitted by the court, in a proceeding under section 43-279, shall be inadmissible against such juvenile in any criminal or civil proceeding but may be considered by a court as part of a presentence investigation involving a subsequent transaction.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 36;

Laws 2023, LB50, § 22.

Juvenile adjudication, inadmissible for purpose of attacking credibility of witness, see section 27-609.